Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-226
Restriction on obtaining consumer's payment.

It is unlawful for a seller to procure the services of any third-party delivery, courier, or other pickup service to obtain a consumer's payment for goods, unless the goods are delivered and can be inspected.

Laws 1999, LB 469, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-2005;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 88.